incubator/apertium-en-sq/apertium-en-sq.sq.dix
    <pardef n="a/i__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>të</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tij</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tij</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jo</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>të</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>saj</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>saj</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tyre</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sosh</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>to</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>to</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tyre</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sosh</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ci/li__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>li<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lin</l>
          <r>li<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lit</l>
          <r>li<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lit</l>
          <r>li<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>li<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lën</l>
          <r>li<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lës</l>
          <r>li<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lës</l>
          <r>li<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lët</l>
          <r>li<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lët</l>
          <r>li<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lëve</l>
          <r>li<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lësh</l>
          <r>li<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lat</l>
          <r>li<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lat</l>
          <r>li<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lave</l>
          <r>li<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lash</l>
          <r>li<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/jam__vbjam">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jam</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>është</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jemi</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jeni</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>janë</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qeshë</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qe</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qe</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qemë</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qetë</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qenë</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isha</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ishe</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ishte</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ishim</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ishit</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ishin</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qenë</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="cili"><i>ci</i><par n="ci/li__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ai"><i>a</i><par n="a/i__det"/></e>
    <e lm="jam"><i/><par n="/jam__vbjam"/></e>
